Utah statutes.
59-5-209.   Adjudicative proceedings for correction of amount of tax.
If any person feels aggrieved because of the amount of the tax determined by
the commission, the person may file a request for agency action with the
commission within 30 days after notice is mailed to the person, requesting an
adjudicative proceeding and the correction of the assessed tax.
